Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2007
District court judgment; rendition before action regularly stood for trial; rights of defendant; no showing of valid defense required.

When the judgment was rendered before the action stood for trial, the suspension may be granted as provided in section 25-2006, although no valid defense to the action is shown; and the court shall make such orders concerning the executions to be issued on the judgment, as shall give to the defendant the same rights of delay he would have had if the judgment had been rendered at the proper time.

R.S.1867, Code § 608, p. 502;

R.S.1913, § 8213;

C.S.1922, § 9166;

C.S.1929, § 20-2007;

R.S.1943, § 25-2007.

Notice required by this section only applies when a default is to be taken in chambers. Frazier, Inc. v. Alexander, 183 Neb. 451, 161 N.W.2d 505 (1968).

Where trial court vacated order of confirmation but did not set aside sale, return of purchase money was not warranted. Enquist v. Enquist, 146 Neb. 708, 21 N.W.2d 404 (1946).